Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.065

Registration or licensing requirements—Military training or experience.

An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the commission determines that the military training or experience is not substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

[ 2011 c 32 s 14.]